Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that requiring state agencies to report to the legislature is an important method of providing information and keeping the legislature informed on the implementation and impacts of legislation. Some reports provide information that is no longer relevant or useful to the legislature, which can be discerned by the lack of interest in the report. There are other reports that are redundant as the information is provided through other means. In addition, preparing reports is time consuming, and there may be better, more efficient mechanisms for sharing information with legislators as well as the public, such as posting the information on agency websites. Finally, some reports are required on a more frequent basis than is necessary, as the information does not change to an extent that merits the increased frequency.(2) In order to improve agency efficiency and still ensure that information is publicly available and provided to the legislature as needed, it is the legislature's intent to eliminate reports that no longer serve a relevant purpose, change reporting frequency where warranted, and provide alternative mechanisms in place of submitting reports where appropriate.PART IMODIFICATIONS TO REPORTSSec. 101. RCW 19.27A.210 and 2025 c 264 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) By November 1, 2020, the department must establish by rule a state energy performance standard for covered buildings.(b) In developing energy performance standards, the department shall seek to maximize reductions of greenhouse gas emissions from the building sector. The standard must include energy use intensity targets by building type and methods of conditional compliance that include an energy management plan, operations and maintenance program, energy efficiency audits, and investment in energy efficiency measures designed to meet the targets. The department shall use ANSI/ASHRAE/IES standard 100-2018 as an initial model for standard development. The department may adopt by rule subsequent versions of standard 100 as its model for standard development. The department must update the standard by July 1, 2029, and every five years thereafter. Prior to the adoption or update of the standard, the department must identify the sources of information it relied upon, including peer-reviewed science.(2) In establishing the standard under subsection (1) of this section, the department:(a) Must develop energy use intensity targets that are no greater than the average energy use intensity for the covered building occupancy type with adjustments for unique energy using features. The department must also develop energy use intensity targets for additional property types eligible for incentives in RCW 19.27A.220. The department may also develop targets for alternative metrics related to energy use and greenhouse gas emissions if alternative metrics are included in standard 100-2018 or subsequent versions. The department must consider regional and local building energy utilization data, such as existing energy star benchmarking data, in establishing targets for the standard. Energy use intensity targets or alternative metrics must be developed for two or more climate zones and be representative of energy use in a normal weather year;(b) May consider building occupancy classifications from ANSI/ASHRAE/IES standard 100 and the United States environmental protection agency's energy star portfolio manager when developing energy use intensity targets;(c) May implement lower energy use intensity targets or alternative metrics for more recently built covered buildings based on the state energy code in place when the buildings were constructed;(d)(i) Must adopt a conditional compliance method that ensures that covered buildings that do not meet the specified energy use intensity targets or alternative metrics are taking action to achieve reduction in energy use, including investment criteria for conditional compliance that ensure that energy efficiency measures identified by energy audits are implemented to achieve a covered building's energy use intensity target or alternative metric. The investment criteria must require that a building owner adopt an implementation plan to meet the energy intensity target or alternative metric or implement an optimized bundle of energy efficiency measures that provides maximum energy savings without resulting in a savings-to-investment ratio of less than 1.0, except as exempted in (d)(ii) of this subsection. The implementation plan must be based on an investment grade energy audit and a life-cycle cost analysis that accounts for the period during which a bundle of measures will provide savings. The building owner's cost for implementing energy efficiency measures must reflect net cost, excluding any costs covered by utility or government grants. The implementation plan may exclude measures that do not pay for themselves over the useful life of the measure and measures excluded under (d)(ii) of this subsection. The implementation plan may include phased implementation such that the building owner is not required to replace a system or equipment before the end of the system or equipment's useful life;(ii) For those buildings or structures that are listed in the state or national register of historic places; designated as a historic property under local or state designation law or survey; certified as a contributing resource with a national register listed or locally designated historic district; or with an opinion or certification that the property is eligible to be listed on the national or state registers of historic places either individually or as a contributing building to a historic district by the state historic preservation officer or the keeper of the national register of historic places, no individual energy efficiency requirement need be met that would compromise the historical integrity of a building or part of a building;(e) Must provide an alternative compliance pathway for an owner of a state campus district energy system, in accordance with RCW 19.27A.260, and more broadly for the owner of any campus district energy system that is approved by the department to opt-in in accordance with RCW 19.27A.260(6);(f) Must guarantee that the owner of a state campus district energy system is not required to implement more than one energy management plan and more than one operations and maintenance plan for the campus;(g) Must guarantee that a state campus district energy system, as defined in RCW 19.27A.260, and all buildings connected to a state campus district energy system, are in compliance with any requirements for campus buildings to implement energy efficiency measures identified by an energy audit if:(i) The energy audit demonstrates the energy savings from the state campus district energy system energy efficiency measures will be greater than the energy efficiency measures identified for the campus buildings; and(ii) The state campus district energy system implements the energy efficiency measures; and(h) May adopt additional compliance pathways for covered building owners to comply with the standard by meeting alternative metrics.(3) Based on records obtained from each county assessor and other available information sources, the department must create a database of covered buildings and building owners required to comply with the standard established in accordance with this section.(4) By July 1, 2021, the department must provide the owners of covered buildings with notification of compliance requirements.(5) The department must develop a method for administering compliance reports from building owners.(6) The department must provide a customer support program to building owners including, but not limited to, outreach and informational material, periodic training, phone and email support, and other technical assistance.(7)(a) The building owner of a covered building must report the building owner's compliance with the standard to the department in accordance with the schedule established under subsection (8) of this section and every five years thereafter. For each reporting date, the building owner must submit documentation to demonstrate that:(i) The weather normalized energy use intensity of the covered building measured in the previous calendar year is less than or equal to the energy use intensity target or equal to the alternative metric;(ii) The covered building has received conditional compliance from the department based on energy efficiency actions prescribed by the standard; or(iii) The covered building is exempt from the standard by demonstrating that the building meets one, or combination of multiple partial exemptions affecting more than 50 percent of building square footage as established by the department by rule, of the following criteria:(A) The building did not have a certificate of occupancy or temporary certificate of occupancy for all 12 months of the calendar year prior to the building owner compliance schedule established under subsection (8) of this section;(B) The building did not have an average physical occupancy of at least 50 percent throughout the calendar year prior to the building owner compliance schedule established under subsection (8) of this section;(C) The sum of the building's gross floor area minus unconditioned and semiconditioned spaces, as defined in the Washington state energy code, is less than 50,000 square feet;(D) The primary use of the building is manufacturing or other industrial purposes, as defined under the following use designations of the international building code: (I) Factory group F; or (II) high hazard group H, including spaces with nonexempt occupancy classifications that are within the manufacturing or industrial building, not to include tenant spaces that are not associated with the primary manufacturing or industrial use of the building;(E) The building is an agricultural structure;(F) The building meets at least one of the following conditions of financial hardship: (I) The building had arrears of property taxes or water or wastewater charges that resulted in the building's inclusion, within the prior two years, on a city's or county's annual tax lien sale list; (II) the building has a court appointed receiver in control of the asset due to financial distress; (III) the building is owned by a financial institution through default by a borrower; (IV) the building has been acquired by a deed in lieu of foreclosure within the previous 24 months; (V) the building has a senior mortgage subject to a notice of default; (VI) the building is a K-12 school building in a school district or a private school that has financial hardships related to capital construction or improvements including, but not limited to, a failed bond and/or levy, limited school district debt capacity, and/or the building is actively correcting a violation of state board of health rules; (VII) the building is a public hospital in a public hospital district that lacks the debt capacity to cover the cost of compliance; or (VIII) other conditions of financial hardship identified by the department by rule; or(G) Extenuating conditions exist, as approved by the department prior to the reporting date including, but not limited to:(I) Buildings for which meeting the standard would impair the historic integrity of the building including, but not limited to, properties listed in the national register of historic places, the Washington heritage register, or local registers of historic places;(II) Buildings for which meeting the standard would impair national security interests;(III) Buildings that have had significant losses in assessed value since the COVID-19 pandemic which ((prevents [prevent]))prevent building owners from securing capital in the form of loans against equity in the covered building; or(IV) Other extenuating circumstances identified by the department by rule that may still require benchmarking, operations and maintenance programs, and energy management plan reporting.(b) The covered building owner may apply to the department for an extension to its compliance date. Requests for extension must be received by the department no sooner than six months prior to and up to six months after the applicable compliance date in order to be processed by the department. The department may approve extension requests for conditions including, but not limited to, conditions beyond the control of the building owner. An extension granted pursuant to this subsection is valid for two years beyond the covered building's compliance date after which the covered building owner may apply to the department for an extension renewal or file for an exemption.(8) A building owner of a tier 1 covered building must meet the following reporting schedule for complying with the standard established under this section:(a) For a building with more than 220,000 gross square feet, June 1, 2026;(b) For a building with more than 90,000 gross square feet but less than 220,001 gross square feet, June 1, 2027; and(c) For a building with more than 50,000 gross square feet but less than 90,001 square feet, June 1, 2028.(9)(a) The department may issue a notice of violation to a building owner for noncompliance with the requirements of this section. A determination of noncompliance may be made for any of the following reasons:(i) Failure to submit a compliance report in the form and manner prescribed by the department;(ii) Failure to meet an energy use intensity target or alternative metric, or failure to receive conditional compliance approval;(iii) Failure to provide accurate reporting consistent with the requirements of the standard established under this section; and(iv) Failure to provide a valid exemption certificate.(b) In order to create consistency with the implementation of the standard and rules adopted under this section, the department must reply and cite the section of law, code, or standard in a notice of violation for noncompliance with the requirements of this section when requested to do so by the building owner or the building owner's agent.(10) The department is authorized to impose an administrative penalty upon a building owner for failing to submit documentation demonstrating compliance with the requirements of this section. The penalty may not exceed an amount equal to $5,000 plus an amount based on the duration of any continuing violation. The additional amount for a continuing violation may not exceed a daily amount equal to $1 per year per gross square foot of floor area. The department may by rule increase the maximum penalty rates to adjust for the effects of inflation. Penalties incurred from noncompliance may not be passed along to tenants, so long as tenants are providing access to utility usage data, physical spaces in the buildings, and being responsive to needs from building owners to facilitate compliance with the standard.(11) Administrative penalties collected under this section must be deposited into the low-income weatherization and structural rehabilitation assistance account created in RCW 70A.35.030.(12) The department must adopt rules as necessary to implement this section, including but not limited to:(a) Rules necessary to ensure timely, accurate, and complete reporting of building energy performance for all covered buildings;(b) Rules necessary to enforce the standard established under this section; and(c) Rules that provide a mechanism for appeal of any administrative penalty imposed by the department under this section.(13) Upon request by the department, each county assessor must provide property data from existing records to the department as necessary to implement this section.(14) By January 15, 2022, and each year thereafter through ((2029))2031, the department must submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the implementation of the state energy performance standard established under this section. The report must include information regarding the adoption of the ANSI/ASHRAE/IES standard 100-2018 as an initial model, the financial impact to building owners required to comply with the standard, the amount of incentives provided under RCW 19.27A.220 and 19.27A.230, and any other significant information associated with the implementation of this section, including administration of the early adoption incentive program under RCW 19.27A.220.Sec. 102. RCW 28A.710.250 and 2020 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By ((March))December 1st of ((each))every odd-numbered year beginning in the first year after there have been charter schools operating for a full school year, the state board of education, in collaboration with the commission, must issue a report on the performance of the state's charter schools during the preceding school year to the governor, the legislature, and the public at large.(2) The ((annual)) report must be based on the reports submitted by each authorizer as well as any additional relevant data compiled by the state board of education. The report must include a comparison of the performance of charter school students with the performance of academically, ethnically, and economically comparable groups of students in other public schools. In addition, the annual report must include the state board of education's assessment of the successes, challenges, and areas for improvement in meeting the purposes of this chapter, including the board's assessment of the sufficiency of funding for charter schools, the efficacy of the formula for authorizer funding, and any suggested changes in state law or policy necessary to strengthen the state's charter schools.(3) Together with the issuance of the annual report following the fifth year after there have been charter schools operating for a full school year, the state board of education, in collaboration with the commission, shall submit a recommendation regarding whether or not the legislature should authorize the establishment of additional charter public schools.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 103. A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW to read as follows:The council shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, on the impacts of chapter 323, Laws of 2024 on degree completion outcomes, including any increase in the number of students using the extended eligibility provided under chapter 323, Laws of 2024.Sec. 104. RCW 43.185C.040 and 2018 c 85 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall, in consultation with the interagency council on homelessness, the affordable housing advisory board, and the state advisory council on homelessness, prepare and publish a five-year homeless housing strategic plan which must outline statewide goals and performance measures. The state homeless housing strategic plan must be submitted to the legislature by ((July 1, 2019))January 1, 2029, and every five years thereafter. The plan must include:(a) Performance measures and goals to reduce homelessness, including long-term and short-term goals;(b) An analysis of the services and programs being offered at the state and county level and an identification of those representing best practices and outcomes;(c) Recognition of services and programs targeted to certain homeless populations or geographic areas in recognition of the diverse needs across the state;(d) New or innovative funding, program, or service strategies to pursue;(e) An analysis of either current drivers of homelessness or improvements to housing security, or both, such as increases and reductions to employment opportunities, housing scarcity and affordability, health and behavioral health services, chemical dependency treatment, and incarceration rates; and(f) An implementation strategy outlining the roles and responsibilities at the state and local level and timelines to achieve a reduction in homelessness at the statewide level during periods of the five-year homeless housing strategic plan.(2) The department must coordinate its efforts on the state homeless housing strategic plan with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs advisory committee under RCW 43.330.705. The state homeless housing strategic plan must not conflict with the strategies, planning, data collection, and performance and outcome measures developed under RCW 43.330.705 and 43.330.706 to reduce the state's homeless youth population.(3) To guide local governments in preparation of local homeless housing plans due December 1, 2019, the department shall issue by December 1, 2018, guidelines consistent with this chapter and including the best available data on each community's homeless population. Program outcomes, performance measures, and goals must be created by the department in collaboration with local governments against which state and local governments' performance will be measured.(4) The department shall develop a consistent statewide data gathering instrument to monitor the performance of cities and counties receiving grants in order to determine compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in the grant application or required by the department.The department shall, in consultation with the interagency council on homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board, report biennially to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature an assessment of the state's performance in furthering the goals of the state five-year homeless housing strategic plan and the performance of each participating local government in creating and executing a local homeless housing plan which meets the requirements of this chapter. To increase the effectiveness of the report, the department must develop a process to ensure consistent presentation, analysis, and explanation in the report, including year-to-year comparisons, highlights of program successes and challenges, and information that supports recommended strategy or operational changes. The report may include performance measures such as:(a) The reduction in the number of homeless individuals and families from the initial count of homeless persons;(b) The reduction in the number of unaccompanied homeless youth. "Unaccompanied homeless youth" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.330.702;(c) The number of new units available and affordable for homeless families by housing type;(d) The number of homeless individuals identified who are not offered suitable housing within thirty days of their request or identification as homeless;(e) The number of households at risk of losing housing who maintain it due to a preventive intervention;(f) The transition time from homelessness to permanent housing;(g) The cost per person housed at each level of the housing continuum;(h) The ability to successfully collect data and report performance;(i) The extent of collaboration and coordination among public bodies, as well as community stakeholders, and the level of community support and participation;(j) The quality and safety of housing provided; and(k) The effectiveness of outreach to homeless persons, and their satisfaction with the program.Sec. 105. RCW 43.185C.045 and 2023 c 277 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By ((December))January 1st of each year, the department must provide an update on the state's homeless housing strategic plan and its activities for the prior fiscal year. The report must include, but not be limited to, the following information:(a) An assessment of the current condition of homelessness in Washington state and the state's performance in meeting the goals in the state homeless housing strategic plan;(b) A report on the results of the annual homeless point-in-time census conducted statewide under RCW 43.185C.030;(c) The amount of federal, state, local, and private funds spent on homelessness assistance, categorized by funding source and the following major assistance types:(i) Emergency shelter;(ii) Homelessness prevention and rapid rehousing;(iii) Permanent housing;(iv) Permanent supportive housing;(v) Transitional housing;(vi) Services only; and(vii) Any other activity in which more than five hundred thousand dollars of category funds were expended;(d) A report on the expenditures, performance, and outcomes of state funds distributed through the consolidated homeless grant program, including the grant recipient, award amount expended, use of the funds, counties served, and households served;(e) A report on state and local homelessness document recording fee expenditure by county, including the total amount of fee spending, percentage of total spending from fees, and number of people served by major assistance type;(f) A report on the expenditures, performance, and outcomes of the essential needs and housing support program meeting the requirements of RCW 43.185C.220;(g) ((A report on the expenditures, performance, and outcomes of the independent youth housing program meeting the requirements of RCW 43.63A.311;(h))) A county-level report on the expenditures, performance, and outcomes of the eviction prevention rental assistance program under RCW 43.185C.185. The report must include, but is not limited to:(i) The number of adults without minor children served in each county;(ii) The number of households with adults and minor children served in each county; and(iii) The number of unaccompanied youth and young adults who are being served in each county; and(((i)))(h) A county-level report on the expenditures, performance, and outcomes of the rapid rehousing, project-based vouchers, and housing acquisition programs under RCW 36.22.250. The report must include, but is not limited to:(i) The number of persons who are unsheltered receiving shelter through a project-based voucher in each county;(ii) The number of units acquired or built via rapid rehousing and housing acquisition in each county; ((and))(iii) The number of adults without minor children, households with adults and minor children, unaccompanied youth, and young adults who are being served by the programs under RCW 36.22.250 in each county; and(iv) A report on the transitional housing operating and rent program and its reporting requirements under RCW 43.185C.210.(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must be posted to the department's website and may include links to updated or revised information contained in the report.(3) Any local government receiving state funds for homelessness assistance or state or local homelessness document recording fees under RCW 36.22.250 must provide an annual report on the current condition of homelessness in its jurisdiction, its performance in meeting the goals in its local homeless housing plan, and any significant changes made to the plan. The annual report must be posted on the department's website. Along with each local government annual report, the department must produce and post information on the local government's homelessness spending from all sources by project during the prior state fiscal year in a format similar to the department's report under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If a local government fails to report or provides an inadequate or incomplete report, the department must take corrective action, which may include withholding state funding for homelessness assistance to the local government to enable the department to use such funds to contract with other public or nonprofit entities to provide homelessness assistance within the jurisdiction.Sec. 106. RCW 47.56.880 and 2019 c 421 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The imposition of tolls for express toll lanes on Interstate 405 between Interstate 5 on the north end in the city of Lynnwood and Interstate 5 on the south end in the city of Tukwila, and for state route number 167 between Interstate 405 on the north end and state route number 512 on the south end is authorized. Interstate 405 and state route number 167 are designated an eligible toll facility, and toll revenue generated in the corridor must only be expended on the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 projects as identified in each corridor's master plan and as allowed under RCW 47.56.820.(2) Tolls for the express toll lanes must be set as follows:(a) The schedule of toll rates must be set by the tolling authority pursuant to RCW 47.56.850. Toll rates may vary in amount by time of day, level of traffic congestion within the highway facility, or other criteria, as the tolling authority deems appropriate.(b) In those locations with two express toll lanes in each direction, the toll rate must be the same in both lanes.(c) Toll charges may not be assessed on transit buses and vanpools.(d) The department shall establish performance standards for travel time, speed, and reliability for the express toll lanes project. The department must automatically adjust the toll rate within the schedule established by the tolling authority, using dynamic tolling, to maintain the goal that average vehicle speeds in the lanes remain above forty-five miles per hour at least ninety percent of the time during peak hours.(e) The tolling authority shall periodically review the toll rates against traffic performance of all lanes to determine if the toll rates are effectively maintaining travel time, speed, and reliability on the highway facilities.(f)(i) Toll charges may not be assessed on carpools with two or more people in the vehicle on the portion of Interstate 405 between Bellevue and state route number 167 for at least the first year following the initial imposition of tolls on that portion of the express toll lanes, contingent upon the analysis described in (f)(ii) of this subsection.(ii) The department must analyze the effect of (f)(i) of this subsection utilizing forecasting and modeling data and present the results of the analysis to the tolling authority. If the analysis indicates that the express toll lanes on the portion of Interstate 405 between Bellevue and state route number 167 will not cover the financial obligations outlined in RCW 47.56.884(4), then the restriction on toll charges in (f)(i) of this subsection will not be implemented and the department must provide the transportation committees of the legislature with a report, within thirty days, that provides options for not assessing toll charges on carpools with two or more people in the vehicle, which also meet the financial obligations outlined in RCW 47.56.884(4).(g) After the bonds issued pursuant to RCW 47.10.896(1)(a) are retired, the tolling authority must reduce the toll rates commensurate with this reduction in the amount of toll revenues required from the express toll lanes.(3) The department shall work with local jurisdictions to minimize and monitor impacts to local streets and, after consultation with local jurisdictions, recommend mitigation measures to the legislature in those locations where it is appropriate.(4) The department shall monitor the express toll lanes and shall ((annually))biennially report to the transportation commission and the legislature on the impacts from the project on the following performance measures:(a) Whether the express toll lanes maintain speeds of forty-five miles per hour at least ninety percent of the time during peak periods, and any alternate metric determined by the department in conjunction with the federal highway administration;(b) Whether the average traffic speed changed in the general purpose lanes;(c) Whether transit ridership changed;(d) Whether the actual use of the express toll lanes is consistent with the projected use;(e) Whether the express toll lanes generated sufficient revenue to pay for all express toll lane-related operating costs; and(f) Whether travel times and volumes have increased or decreased on adjacent local streets and state highways.(5) The department, in consultation with the transportation commission, shall consider making operational changes necessary to fix any unintended consequences of implementing the express toll lanes.(6) A violation of the lane restrictions applicable to the express toll lanes established under this section is a traffic infraction.Sec. 107. RCW 47.66.120 and 2025 c 416 s 717 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The department's public transportation division shall establish a green transportation capital grant program. The purpose of the grant program is to aid any transit authority in funding cost-effective capital projects to reduce the carbon intensity of the Washington transportation system, examples of which include: Electrification of vehicle fleets, including battery and fuel cell electric vehicles; modification or replacement of capital facilities in order to facilitate fleet electrification and/or hydrogen refueling; necessary upgrades to electrical transmission and distribution systems; and construction of charging and fueling stations. The department's public transportation division shall identify projects and shall submit a prioritized list of all projects requesting funding to the legislature and the office of financial management by ((December))November 1st of each even-numbered year.(b) The department's public transportation division shall select projects based on a competitive process that considers the following criteria:(i) The cost-effectiveness of the reductions in carbon emissions provided by the project; and(ii) The benefit provided to transitioning the entire state to a transportation system with lower carbon intensity.(c) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the department must incorporate principles into the grant selection process with the goal of increasing the distribution of funding to communities based on addressing environmental harms and providing environmental benefits for overburdened communities, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010, and vulnerable populations.(2) The department's public transportation division must establish an advisory committee to assist in identifying projects under subsection (1) of this section. The advisory committee must include representatives from the department of ecology, the department of commerce, the utilities and transportation commission, and at least one transit authority.(3) In order to receive green transportation capital grant program funding for a project, a transit authority must provide matching funding at the level deemed appropriate by the department.(4) The department's public transportation division must report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of any grant projects funded by the program created under this section.(5) For purposes of this section, "transit authority" means a city transit system under RCW 35.58.2721 or chapter 35.95A RCW, a county public transportation authority under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation transit system under chapter 36.56 RCW, a public transportation benefit area under chapter 36.57A RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit area under RCW 36.57.100, a regional transit authority under chapter 81.112 RCW, or any special purpose district formed to operate a public transportation system.(6) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may provide up to 20 percent of the total green transportation capital grant program funding for zero emissions capital transition planning projects. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department may provide up to 10 percent of the total green transportation capital grant program funding for zero emissions capital transition planning projects. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department may provide up to five percent of the total green transportation capital grant program funding for zero emissions capital transition planning projects.Sec. 108. RCW 54.16.425 and 2021 c 294 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Property owned by a public utility district that is exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.010 is subject to an annual payment in lieu of property taxes if the property consists of a broadband infrastructure used in providing retail telecommunications services.(2)(a) The amount of the payment must be determined jointly and in good faith negotiation between the public utility district that owns the property and the county or counties in which the property is located.(b) The amount agreed upon may not exceed the property tax amount that would be owed on the property comprising the broadband infrastructure used in providing retail telecommunications services as calculated by the department of revenue. The public utility district must provide information necessary for the department of revenue to make the required valuation under this subsection. The department of revenue must provide the amount of property tax that would be owed on the property to the county or counties in which the broadband infrastructure is located on an annual basis.(c) If the public utility district and a county cannot agree on the amount of the payment in lieu of taxes, either party may invoke binding arbitration by providing written notice to the other party. In the event that the amount of payment in lieu of taxes is submitted to binding arbitration, the arbitrators must consider the government services available to the public utility district's broadband infrastructure used in providing retail telecommunications services. The public utility district and county must each select one arbitrator, the two of whom must pick a third arbitrator. Costs of the arbitration, including compensation for the arbitrators' services, must be borne equally by the parties participating in the arbitration.(3) By April 30th of each year, a public utility district must remit the annual payment to the county treasurer of each county in which the public utility district's broadband infrastructure used in providing retail telecommunications services is located in a form and manner required by the county treasurer.(4) The county must distribute the amounts received under this section to all property taxing districts, including the state, in appropriate tax code areas in the same proportion as it would distribute property taxes from taxable property.(5) By December 1, ((2019))2026, and ((annually))biennially thereafter, the department of revenue must submit a report to the appropriate legislative committees detailing the amount of payments made under this section and the amount of property tax that would be owed on the property comprising the broadband infrastructure used in providing retail telecommunications services.Sec. 109. RCW 70A.02.090 and 2021 c 314 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By September 1st of each year, each covered agency must annually update the council on the development and implementation of environmental justice in agency strategic plans pursuant to RCW 70A.02.040, budgeting and funding criteria for making budgeting and funding decisions pursuant to RCW 70A.02.080, and community engagement plans pursuant to RCW 70A.02.050.(2)(a) Beginning in 2024, as part of each covered agency's annual update to the council under subsection (1) of this section, each covered agency must include updates on the agency's implementation status with respect to the environmental justice assessments under RCW 70A.02.060.(b) By ((September 1st))November 30th of each year ((beginning in 2024)), each covered agency must publish or update a dashboard report, in a uniform dashboard format on the office of financial management's website, describing the agency's progress on:(i) Incorporating environmental justice in its strategic plan;(ii) The obligations of agencies relating to budgets and funding under RCW 70A.02.080; and(iii) Its environmental justice assessments of proposed significant agency actions, including logistical metrics related to covered agency completion of environmental justice assessments.(3) Each covered agency must file a notice with the office of financial management of significant agency actions for which the agency is initiating an environmental justice assessment under RCW 70A.02.060. The office of financial management must prepare a list of all filings received from covered agencies each week and must post the list on its website and make it available to any interested parties. The list of filings must include a brief description of the significant agency action and the methods for providing public comment for agency consideration as part of the environmental justice assessment.(4) Each covered agency must identify overburdened communities, as required by RCW 70A.02.050, in such a way that the performance effectiveness of the duties created by this chapter can be measured, including the effectiveness of environmental justice assessments required by RCW 70A.02.060. Each covered agency may identify and prioritize overburdened communities as needed to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.Sec. 110. RCW 70A.535.050 and 2022 c 182 s 412 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The rules adopted under RCW 70A.535.030 and 70A.535.025 may allow the generation of credits from activities that support the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions associated with transportation in Washington, including but not limited to:(a) Carbon capture and sequestration projects, including but not limited to:(i) Innovative crude oil production projects that include carbon capture and sequestration;(ii) Project-based refinery greenhouse gas mitigation including, but not limited to, process improvements, renewable hydrogen use, and carbon capture and sequestration; or(iii) Direct air capture projects;(b) Investments and activities that support deployment of machinery and equipment used to produce gaseous and liquid fuels from nonfossil feedstocks, and derivatives thereof;(c) The fueling of battery or fuel cell electric vehicles by a commercial, nonprofit, or public entity that is not an electric utility, which may include, but is not limited to, the fueling of vehicles using electricity certified by the department to have a carbon intensity of zero; and(d) The use of smart vehicle charging technology that results in the fueling of an electric vehicle during times when the carbon intensity of grid electricity is comparatively low.(2)(a) The rules adopted under RCW 70A.535.030 and 70A.535.025 must allow the generation of credits based on capacity for zero emission vehicle refueling infrastructure, including DC fast charging infrastructure and hydrogen refueling infrastructure.(b) The rules adopted under RCW 70A.535.030 and 70A.535.025 may allow the generation of credits from the provision of low carbon fuel infrastructure not specified in (a) of this subsection.(3) The rules adopted under RCW 70A.535.030 and 70A.535.025 must allow the generation of credits from state transportation investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act for activities and projects that reduce greenhouse gas emissions and decarbonize the transportation sector. These include, but are not limited to: (a) Electrical grid and hydrogen fueling infrastructure investments; (b) ferry operating and capital investments; (c) electrification of the state ferry fleet; (d) alternative fuel vehicle rebate programs; (e) transit grants; (f) infrastructure and other costs associated with the adoption of alternative fuel use by transit agencies; (g) bike and pedestrian grant programs and other activities; (h) complete streets and safe walking grants and allocations; (i) rail funding; and (j) multimodal investments.(4) The rules adopted by the department may establish limits for the number of credits that may be earned each year by persons participating in the program for some or all of the activities specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The department must limit the number of credits that may be earned each year under subsection (3) of this section to 10 percent of the total program credits. Any limits established under this subsection must take into consideration the return on investment required in order for an activity specified in subsection (2) of this section to be financially viable.(5)(a) In coordination with the department, the Washington state department of transportation must immediately begin work on identifying the amount of credit revenues likely to be generated under subsection (3) of this section from the state transportation investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act, including the move ahead WA transportation package. It is the intent of the legislature that these credits will be maximized to allow further investment in efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and decarbonize the transportation sector including, but not limited to, additional funding in future years, for ferry electrification beyond four new hybrid electric vessels, active transportation, and transit programs and projects.(b) Beginning November 1, 2022, and ((annually))every other year thereafter, the Washington state department of transportation must present a detailed projection of the credit revenues generated under subsection (3) of this section and a preferred reinvestment strategy for the revenues for the following 10-year time period to the joint transportation committee.Sec. 111. RCW 74.09.888 and 2022 c 216 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) To establish and administer RCW 74.09.886, the authority shall:(a)(i) Establish or amend a contract with a coordinating entity to:(A) Assure the availability of access to eligibility determinations services for community support services benefits and permanent supportive housing benefits;(B) Verify that persons meet the eligibility standards of RCW 74.09.886(2);(C) Coordinate enrollment in medical assistance programs for persons who meet the eligibility standards of RCW 74.09.886(2), except for actual enrollment in a medical assistance program under this chapter; and(D) Coordinate with a network of community support services providers to arrange with local housing providers for the placement of an eligible person in permanent supportive housing appropriate to the person's needs and assure that community support services are provided to the person by a community support services provider.(ii) The primary role of the coordinating entity or entities is administrative and operational, while the authority shall establish the general policy parameters for the work of the coordinating entity or entities.(iii) In selecting the coordinating entity or entities, the authority shall: Choose one or more organizations that are capable of coordinating access to both community support services and permanent supportive housing services to eligible persons under RCW 74.09.886; and select no more than one coordinating entity per region which is served by medicaid managed care organizations;(b) Report to the office for the ongoing monitoring of the program; and(c) Adopt any rules necessary to implement the program.(2) The authority shall establish a work group to provide feedback to the agency on its foundational community supports program as it aligns with the work of the housing benefit. The work group may include representatives of state agencies, behavioral health administrative services organizations, the coordinating entity or entities, and contracted agencies providing foundational community supports services. Topics may include, but are not limited to, best practices in eligibility screening processes and case rate billing for foundational community supports housing, regional cost differentials, costs consistent with specialized needs, improved data access and data sharing with foundational community supports providers, and requirements related to the use of a common practice tool among community support services providers to integrate social determinants of health into service delivery. The authority, in consultation with foundational community supports providers and their stakeholders, shall engage each region on case management tools and programs, evaluate effectiveness, and inform the appropriate committees of the legislature on the use of case management tools. Case management shall also be a regular item of engagement in the work group. The authority shall convene the work group at least once each quarter and may expand upon, but not duplicate, existing work groups or advisory councils at the authority or other state agencies.(3) To support the goals of the program and the goals of other statewide initiatives to identify and address social needs, including efforts within the 1115 waiver renewal to advance health equity and health-related supports, the authority shall work with the office and the department of social and health services to research, identify, and implement statewide universal measures to identify and consider social determinants of health domains, including housing, food security, transportation, financial strain, and interpersonal safety. The authority shall select an accredited or nationally vetted tool, including criteria for prioritization, for the community support services provider to use when making determinations about housing options and other support services to offer individuals eligible for the program. This screening and prioritization process may not exclude clients transitioning from inpatient or other behavioral health residential treatment settings. The authority shall inform the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress to this end.(4)(a) The authority and the department may seek and accept funds from private and federal sources to support the purposes of the program.(b) The authority shall seek approval from the federal department of health and human services to:(i) Receive federal matching funds for administrative costs and services provided under the program to persons enrolled in medicaid;(ii) Align the eligibility and benefit standards of the foundational community supports program established pursuant to the waiver, entitled "medicaid transformation project" and initially approved November 2017, between the authority and the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, as amended and reauthorized, with the standards of the program, including extending the duration of the benefits under the foundational community supports program to not less than 12 months; and(iii) Implement a medical and psychiatric respite care benefit for certain persons enrolled in medicaid.(5)(a) By December 1, 2022, the authority and the office shall report to the governor and the legislature on preparedness for the first year of program implementation, including the estimated enrollment, estimated program costs, estimated supportive housing unit availability, funding availability for the program from all sources, efforts to improve billing and administrative burdens for foundational community supports providers, efforts to streamline continuity of care and system connection for persons who are potentially eligible for foundational community supports, and any statutory or budgetary needs to successfully implement the first year of the program.(b) By December 1, 2023, the authority and the office shall report to the governor and the legislature on the progress of the first year of program implementation and preparedness for the second year of program implementation.(c) By December 1, 2024, the authority and the office shall report to the governor and the legislature on the progress of the first two years of program implementation and preparedness for ongoing housing acquisition and development.(d) By December 1, 2026, the authority and the office shall report to the governor and the legislature on the full implementation of the program, including the number of persons served by the program, available permanent supportive housing units, estimated unmet demand for the program, ongoing funding requirements for the program, and funding availability for the program from all sources. Beginning December 1, 2027, the authority and the office shall provide ((annual))biennial updates to the governor and the legislature on the status of the program.Sec. 112. RCW 74.09.495 and 2019 c 325 s 4002 are each amended to read as follows:(1) To better assure and understand issues related to network adequacy and access to services, the authority shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, ((2017))2026, and ((annually))biennially thereafter, on the status of access to behavioral health services for children from birth through age seventeen using data collected pursuant to RCW 70.320.050.(2) At a minimum, the report must include the following components broken down by age, gender, and race and ethnicity:(a) The percentage of discharges for patients ages six through seventeen who had a visit to the emergency room with a primary diagnosis of mental health or alcohol or other drug dependence during the measuring year and who had a follow-up visit with any provider with a corresponding primary diagnosis of mental health or alcohol or other drug dependence within thirty days of discharge;(b) The percentage of health plan members with an identified mental health need who received mental health services during the reporting period;(c) The percentage of children served by behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations, including the types of services provided;(d) The number of children's mental health providers available in the previous ((year))two years, the languages spoken by those providers, and the overall percentage of children's mental health providers who were actively accepting new patients; and(e) Data related to mental health and medical services for eating disorder treatment in children and youth by county, including the number of:(i) Eating disorder diagnoses;(ii) Patients treated in outpatient, residential, emergency, and inpatient care settings; and(iii) Contracted providers specializing in eating disorder treatment and the overall percentage of those providers who were actively accepting new patients during the reporting period.Sec. 113. RCW 74.39A.275 and 2018 c 278 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:In order to monitor quality of care and safety of consumers, employment conditions of individual providers, and compliance with the provisions of payment of hours in excess of forty hours each workweek for any single individual provider, the department must provide ((annual))biennial expenditure reports to the legislative fiscal committees and joint legislative-executive overtime oversight task force created under RCW 74.39A.525. The report must contain the following information:(1) The number of individual providers receiving payment for more than forty hours in a workweek, specifying how many of those individual providers were eligible for those hours due to meeting the conditions of RCW 74.39A.525.(2) The number of hours paid and the amount paid for hours in excess of forty hours in a workweek, specifying how many of those hours and payments were for individual providers eligible for those hours and payments due to meeting the conditions of RCW 74.39A.525 (1) or (2).(3) In reporting the information required in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department must provide total amounts, averages, and a display of the distribution of the amounts.(4) The information required must be provided by department region and county of client, department program, and must be specified for individual providers by the number of clients they serve.(5) Any personally identifiable information of consumers and individual providers used to develop this report is confidential under RCW 43.17.410 and exempt from public disclosure, inspection, or copying in accordance with chapter 42.56RCW. However, information may be released in aggregate form, with any personally identifiable information redacted, for the purpose of statistical analysis and oversight of agency performance and actions.PART IIREMOVAL OF REPORTSSec. 201. RCW 10.77.520 and 2015 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(((1))) If the secretary determines in writing that a person committed to the custody of the secretary for treatment as criminally insane presents an unreasonable safety risk which, based on behavior, clinical history, and facility security is not manageable in a state hospital setting, and the secretary has given consideration to reasonable alternatives that would be effective to manage the behavior, the secretary may place the person in any secure facility operated by the secretary or the secretary of the department of corrections. The secretary's written decision and reasoning must be documented in the patient's medical file. Any person affected by this provision shall receive appropriate mental health treatment governed by a formalized treatment plan targeted at mental health rehabilitation needs and shall be afforded his or her rights under RCW 10.77.545, 10.77.550, and 10.77.595. The secretary of the department of social and health services shall retain legal custody of any person placed under this section and review any placement outside of a department mental health hospital every three months, or sooner if warranted by the person's mental health status, to determine if the placement remains appropriate.(((2) Beginning December 1, 2010, and every six months thereafter, the secretary shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the use of the authority under this section to transfer persons to a secure facility. The report shall include information related to the number of persons who have been placed in a secure facility operated by the secretary or the secretary of the department of corrections, and the length of time that each such person has been in the secure facility.))Sec. 202. RCW 13.34.360 and 2018 c 182 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For purposes of this section:(a) "Appropriate location" means (i) the emergency department of a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW during the hours the hospital is in operation; (ii) a fire station during its hours of operation and while fire personnel are present; or (iii) a federally designated rural health clinic during its hours of operation.(b) "Newborn" means a live human being who is less than seventy-two hours old.(c) "Qualified person" means (i) any person that the parent transferring the newborn reasonably believes is a bona fide employee, volunteer, or medical staff member of the hospital or federally designated rural health clinic and who represents to the parent transferring the newborn that he or she can and will summon appropriate resources to meet the newborn's immediate needs; or (ii) a firefighter, volunteer, or emergency medical technician at a fire station who represents to the parent transferring the newborn that he or she can and will summon appropriate resources to meet the newborn's immediate needs.(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate location is not subject to criminal liability under RCW 9A.42.060, 9A.42.070, 9A.42.080, 26.20.030, or 26.20.035.(3)(a) The qualified person at an appropriate location shall not require the parent transferring the newborn to provide any identifying information in order to transfer the newborn.(b) The qualified person at an appropriate location shall attempt to protect the anonymity of the parent who transfers the newborn, while providing an opportunity for the parent to anonymously give the qualified person such information as the parent knows about the family medical history of the parents and the newborn. The qualified person at an appropriate location shall provide referral information about adoption options, counseling, appropriate medical and emotional aftercare services, domestic violence, and legal rights to the parent seeking to transfer the newborn.(c) If a parent of a newborn transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate location pursuant to this section, the qualified person shall cause child protective services to be notified within twenty-four hours after receipt of such a newborn. Child protective services shall assume custody of the newborn within twenty-four hours after receipt of notification.(d) A federally designated rural health clinic is not required to provide ongoing medical care of a transferred newborn beyond that already required by law and may transfer the newborn to a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW. The federally designated rural health clinic shall notify child protective services of the transfer of the newborn to the hospital.(e) A hospital, federally designated rural health clinic, or fire station, its employees, volunteers, and medical staff are immune from any criminal or civil liability for accepting or receiving a newborn under this section.(4)(a) Beginning July 1, 2011, an appropriate location shall post a sign indicating that the location is an appropriate place for the safe and legal transfer of a newborn.(b) To cover the costs of acquiring and placing signs, appropriate locations may accept nonpublic funds and donations.(((5) The department shall collect and compile information concerning the number of newborns transferred under this section after June 7, 2018. The department shall report its findings to the public annually, which may be on its website, beginning July 31, 2018.))Sec. 203. RCW 28A.188.070 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to high schools to implement specialized courses in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) careers as provided by a national multidisciplinary science, technology, engineering, and mathematics program. Grant funds must be allocated on a one-time basis and may be used to purchase course curriculum and equipment, initial course student materials, and support professional development for course teachers.(2) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant recipients based on the criteria in this subsection (2). This is a competitive grant process. Successful high school applicants must:(a) Demonstrate engaged and committed high school and district leadership and faculty in support of expanding specialized STEM courses;(b) Demonstrate that faculty are appropriately trained to offer specialized STEM courses or a plan for faculty to obtain the appropriate training;(c) Demonstrate capacity to offer the specialized STEM courses and maximize the use of grant resources by addressing: Availability of appropriate physical space, meeting program technology requirements, providing projected enrollment at the high school and from area high schools as appropriate, planned hours and days each week the program is to be offered, and other specific program requirements set forth by the superintendent of public instruction;(d) Provide the plan for course implementation that includes a beginning date for first classes as well as plans for recruiting and retaining students in the course;(e) Provide a plan to promote opportunities for students to acquire college credit;(f) Demonstrate a history of successful partnerships within the community and partner support for implementing specialized STEM courses. Partner support may include one or more of the following: Supplying materials, instruction support, internships, mentorships, apprenticeships, and other program components;(g) Demonstrate connections to community and technical college programs as well as links to four-year higher education institution STEM programs; and(h) Demonstrate capacity to continue the course in years succeeding the initial grant year.(((3)(a) The education data center in the office of financial management must, with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, collect student course enrollment and course completion information.(b) The education data center must: (i) Study mathematics and science course-taking patterns of students completing specialized STEM courses; and (ii) follow the students to employment or further training and education in the two years following high school. This study must be designed to inform policymakers about the extent to which specialized science, technology, engineering, and mathematics classes taken by students reduce mathematics remediation of students entering the workplace, apprenticeships, community and technical colleges, and four-year institutions of higher education. Study findings must be reported annually beginning January 2014 and each January thereafter through January 2018 to the governor, appropriate state agencies, and the appropriate education and fiscal committees of the legislature.))Sec. 204. RCW 28A.700.100 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a))) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to high schools to implement a training program to prepare students for employment as entry-level aerospace assemblers. Grant funds must be allocated on a one-time basis and may be used to purchase or improve course curriculum, purchase course equipment, and support professional development for course teachers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult and team with the community and technical colleges' center of excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing regarding the developing aerospace program of study and industry career needs. This information must assist the office of the superintendent of public instruction in refining specific aspects to the criteria in (((b) of this)) subsection (2) of this section and leveraging advantages and opportunities for students in selected high schools.(((b)))(2) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant recipients based on the criteria in this subsection (((1)(b)))(2). This is a competitive grant process. Successful high school applicants must:(((i)))(a) Demonstrate engaged and committed high school and district leadership and faculty in support of the aerospace assembler program;(((ii)))(b) Demonstrate capacity to offer the program and maximize the use of grant resources addressing: Availability of appropriate physical space, meeting program technology requirements, providing projected enrollment from the high school as well as from other area high schools as appropriate, planned hours and days each week the program is to be offered, and other specific program requirements set forth by the office of the superintendent of public instruction;(((iii)))(c) Demonstrate linkages to programs at local community and technical colleges and private technical schools to provide a seamless pathway for students to continue their education and career preparation beyond high school;(((iv)))(d) Demonstrate a history of successful partnerships within the community and partner support for implementing an entry-level aerospace assembler program that includes one or more of the following: Apprenticeships, supplying materials, instruction support, internships, mentorships, and other program components;(((v)))(e) Provide the plan for program implementation that includes a beginning date for first classes as well as plans for recruiting and retaining students in the course; and(((vi)))(f) Demonstrate capacity to continue the program in years succeeding the initial grant year.(((2) The education data center in the office of financial management must collect aerospace assembler program student participation and completion data for grant recipient high schools. The center must follow students to employment or further training and education in the two years following the students' completion of the program. Findings must be reported beginning in January 2014 and each January thereafter through January 2018 to the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, other appropriate state agencies, and the appropriate education and fiscal committees of the legislature.))Sec. 205. RCW 28A.700.110 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to skill centers to implement enhanced manufacturing skills programs. Grant funds must be allocated on a one-time basis and may be used to purchase or improve program curriculum, purchase course equipment, and support professional development for program teachers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult and team with the community and technical colleges' center of excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing regarding the developing aerospace program of study and industry career needs as well as other community and technical college manufacturing programs. This information must assist the office of the superintendent of public instruction in refining specific aspects to the criteria in subsection (2) of this section and leveraging advantages and opportunities for students in selected skill centers.(2) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant recipients based on the criteria in this subsection (2). This is a competitive grant process. Successful skill center applicants must:(a) Demonstrate that enhanced manufacturing skills programs meet industry certification standards;(b) Demonstrate engaged and committed skill center and school district leadership and faculty in support of the program;(c) Demonstrate capacity to offer the enhanced manufacturing skills programs and maximize the use of grant resources addressing: Availability of appropriate physical space, meeting program technology requirements, providing projected enrollment from area high schools and students from area community and technical colleges if space is available, planned hours and days each week the program is to be offered, and other specific program requirements set forth by the office of the superintendent of public instruction;(d) Demonstrate linkages to programs at local community and technical colleges and private technical schools to provide a seamless pathway for students to continue their education and career preparation beyond high school;(e) Demonstrate a history of successful partnerships within the community and partner support for implementing an enhanced manufacturing skills program that includes one or more of the following: Apprenticeships, supplying materials, instruction support, internships, mentorships, and other program components;(f) Provide the plan for program implementation that includes a beginning date for first classes as well as plans for recruiting and retaining students in the program; and(g) Demonstrate capacity to continue the program in years succeeding the initial grant year.(((3) The education research center in the office of financial management must collect enhanced manufacturing skills programs student participation and completion data for grant recipient skill centers. The center must follow students to employment or further training and education in the two years following the students' completion of the program. Findings must be reported beginning in January 2014 and each January thereafter through January 2018 to the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, other appropriate state agencies, and the appropriate education and fiscal committees of the legislature.))Sec. 206. RCW 28B.95.045 and 2018 c 188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(((1))) The committee shall create an expedited process by which owners can complete a direct rollover or investment change of a 529 account from a:(((a)))(1) State-sponsored prepaid tuition plan to a state-sponsored college savings plan;(((b)))(2) State-sponsored college savings plan to a state-sponsored prepaid tuition plan; or(((c)))(3) State-sponsored prepaid tuition plan or a state-sponsored college savings plan to an out-of-state eligible 529 plan.(((2) The committee shall report annually to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on (a) the number of accounts that have been rolled into the Washington college savings program from out of state and (b) the number of accounts rolled out of the Washington college savings program to 529 plans into other states.))Sec. 207. RCW 41.05.065 and 2025 c 396 s 1 and 2025 c 339 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The public employees' benefits board shall study all matters connected with the provision of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state. However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.(2) The public employees' benefits board shall develop employee benefit plans that include comprehensive health care benefits for employees. In developing these plans, the public employees' benefits board shall consider the following elements:(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to quality health care;(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;(c)(i) Wellness initiatives that focus on proven strategies, such as smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education.(ii)(A) As of January 1, 2028, the public employees' benefits board shall no longer offer the smart health program, which includes the wellness incentive and the smart health online portal.(B) Employees who have met the eligibility requirements to receive a wellness incentive by December 31, 2027, will still receive the wellness incentive in plan year 2028.(C) Employees are not eligible to earn a wellness incentive as of January 1, 2028;(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of providers;(e) Effective coordination of benefits; and(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities.(3) To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care benefits, benefits provided to employees shall be substantially equivalent to the state employees' health benefit plan in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit changes or increases in employee point-of-service payments or employee premium payments for benefits or the administration of a high deductible health plan in conjunction with a health savings account. The public employees' benefits board may establish employee eligibility criteria which are not substantially equivalent to employee eligibility criteria in effect on January 1, 1993.(4) Except if bargained for under chapter 41.80 RCW, the public employees' benefits board shall design benefits and determine the terms and conditions of employee and retired or disabled school employee participation and coverage, including establishment of eligibility criteria subject to the requirements of this chapter. Employer groups obtaining benefits through contractual agreement with the authority for employees defined in RCW 41.05.011(6)(a) (i) through (vi) may contractually agree with the authority to benefits eligibility criteria which differs from that determined by the public employees' benefits board. The eligibility criteria established by the public employees' benefits board shall be no more restrictive than the following:(a) Except as provided in (b) through (e) of this subsection, an employee is eligible for benefits from the date of employment if the employing agency anticipates he or she will work an average of at least eighty hours per month and for at least eight hours in each month for more than six consecutive months. An employee determined ineligible for benefits at the beginning of his or her employment shall become eligible in the following circumstances:(i) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per month and for at least eight hours in each month and whose anticipated duration of employment is revised from less than or equal to six consecutive months to more than six consecutive months becomes eligible when the revision is made.(ii) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per month over a period of six consecutive months and for at least eight hours in each of those six consecutive months becomes eligible at the first of the month following the six-month averaging period.(b) A seasonal employee is eligible for benefits from the date of employment if the employing agency anticipates that he or she will work an average of at least eighty hours per month and for at least eight hours in each month of the season. A seasonal employee determined ineligible at the beginning of his or her employment who works an average of at least eighty hours per month over a period of six consecutive months and at least eight hours in each of those six consecutive months becomes eligible at the first of the month following the six-month averaging period. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee who works a season of less than nine months shall not be eligible for the employer contribution during the off season, but may continue enrollment in benefits during the off season by self-paying for the benefits. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee who works a season of nine months or more is eligible for the employer contribution through the off season following each season worked.(c) Faculty are eligible as follows:(i) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will work halfâtime or more for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are eligible for benefits from the date of employment. Eligibility shall continue until the beginning of the first full month of the next instructional year, unless the employment relationship is terminated, in which case eligibility shall cease the first month following the notice of termination or the effective date of the termination, whichever is later.(ii) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are eligible for benefits at the beginning of the second consecutive quarter or semester of employment in which he or she is anticipated to work, or has actually worked, half-time or more. Such an employee shall continue to receive uninterrupted employer contributions for benefits if the employee works at least half-time in a quarter or semester. Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period, but who actually work half-time or more throughout the entire instructional year, are eligible for summer or off-quarter or off-semester coverage. Faculty who have met the criteria of this subsection (4)(c)(ii), who work at least two quarters or two semesters of the academic year with an average academic year workload of half-time or more for three quarters or two semesters of the academic year, and who have worked an average of half-time or more in each of the two preceding academic years shall continue to receive uninterrupted employer contributions for benefits if he or she works at least half-time in a quarter or semester or works two quarters or two semesters of the academic year with an average academic workload each academic year of half-time or more for three quarters or two semesters. Eligibility under this section ceases immediately if this criteria is not met.(iii) Faculty may establish or maintain eligibility for benefits by working for more than one institution of higher education. When faculty work for more than one institution of higher education, those institutions shall prorate the employer contribution costs, or if eligibility is reached through one institution, that institution will pay the full employer contribution. Faculty working for more than one institution must alert his or her employers to his or her potential eligibility in order to establish eligibility.(iv) The employing agency must provide written notice to faculty who are potentially eligible for benefits under this subsection (4)(c) of their potential eligibility.(v) To be eligible for maintenance of benefits through averaging under (c)(ii) of this subsection, faculty must provide written notification to his or her employing agency or agencies of his or her potential eligibility.(vi) For the purposes of this subsection (4)(c):(A) "Academic year" means summer, fall, winter, and spring quarters or summer, fall, and spring semesters;(B) "Half-time" means one-half of the full-time academic workload as determined by each institution; except that for community and technical college faculty, half-time academic workload is calculated according to RCW 28B.50.489.(d) A legislator is eligible for benefits on the date his or her term begins. All other elected and full-time appointed officials of the legislative and executive branches of state government are eligible for benefits on the date his or her term begins or they take the oath of office, whichever occurs first.(e) A justice of the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior courts become eligible for benefits on the date he or she takes the oath of office.(f) Except as provided in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, eligibility ceases for any employee the first of the month following termination of the employment relationship.(g) In determining eligibility under this section, the employing agency may disregard training hours, standby hours, or temporary changes in work hours as determined by the authority under this section.(h) Insurance coverage for all eligible employees begins on the first day of the month following the date when eligibility for benefits is established. If the date eligibility is established is the first working day of a month, insurance coverage begins on that date.(i) Eligibility for an employee whose work circumstances are described by more than one of the eligibility categories in (a) through (e) of this subsection shall be determined solely by the criteria of the category that most closely describes the employee's work circumstances.(j) Except for an employee eligible for benefits under (b) or (c)(ii) of this subsection, an employee who has established eligibility for benefits under this section shall remain eligible for benefits each month in which he or she is in pay status for eight or more hours, if (i) he or she remains in a benefits-eligible position and (ii) leave from the benefits-eligible position is approved by the employing agency. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee is eligible for the employer contribution in any month of his or her season in which he or she is in pay status eight or more hours during that month. Eligibility ends if these conditions are not met, the employment relationship is terminated, or the employee voluntarily transfers to a noneligible position.(k) For the purposes of this subsection, the public employees' benefits board shall define "benefits-eligible position."(5) The public employees' benefits board may authorize premium contributions for an employee and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of cost-efficient managed health care systems.(6)(((a))) For any open enrollment period following August 24, 2011, the public employees' benefits board shall offer a health savings account option for employees that conforms to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The public employees' benefits board shall comply with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of health savings accounts.(((b) By November 30, 2015, and each year thereafter, the authority shall submit a report to the relevant legislative policy and fiscal committees that includes the following:(i) Public employees' benefits board health plan cost and service utilization trends for the previous three years, in total and for each health plan offered to employees;(ii) For each health plan offered to employees, the number and percentage of employees and dependents enrolled in the plan, and the age and gender demographics of enrollees in each plan;(iii) Any impact of enrollment in alternatives to the most comprehensive plan, including the high deductible health plan with a health savings account, upon the cost of health benefits for those employees who have chosen to remain enrolled in the most comprehensive plan.))(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for any open enrollment period following August 24, 2011, the public employees' benefits board shall offer a high deductible health plan in conjunction with a health savings account developed under subsection (6) of this section.(8) Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care benefit plans developed by the public employees' benefits board and may be permitted to waive coverage under terms and conditions established by the public employees' benefits board.(9) In addition to the benefits offering authority under this chapter, the public employees' benefits board may study, establish evaluation criteria, and, subject to the availability of funding, offer the following employee-paid, voluntary benefits:(a) Emergency transportation;(b) Identity protection;(c) Legal aid;(d) Long-term care insurance;(e) Noncommercial personal automobile insurance;(f) Personal homeowner's or renter's insurance;(g) Pet insurance;(h) Specified disease or illness-triggered fixed payment insurance, hospital confinement fixed payment insurance, or other fixed payment insurance offered as an independent, noncoordinated benefit regulated by the office of the insurance commissioner; and(i) Travel insurance.(10) The public employees' benefits board may establish penalties to be imposed by the authority when the eligibility determinations of an employing agency fail to comply with the criteria under this chapter.Sec. 208. RCW 43.21A.150 and 2017 c 47 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(((1))) The director, whenever it is lawful and feasible to do so, shall consult and cooperate with the federal government, as well as with other states and Canadian provinces, in the study and control of environmental problems. On behalf of the department, the director is authorized to accept, receive, disburse, and administer grants or other funds or gifts from any source, including private individuals or agencies, the federal government, and other public agencies, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.(((2)(a) Beginning December 31, 2017, the director must list on the department's website information regarding the current interagency agreements to which the department is a party or in which the department is a participant.(b) The list must identify each agreement, the type of agreement, parties to the agreement, the effective date of the agreement, and a brief description of the agreement. The list must include all interagency agreements involving the department and other state agencies, local governments, special purpose districts, the federal government and federal government agencies, and the agencies of other states.(c) For the initial list, the department must by December 31, 2017, list all grant agreements and federal agreements where information is readily extractable from the department's data systems. For those data systems that, because of their age, require programming support to extract and format data for publishing to the internet, the department must complete listing the required information according to the following schedule:(i) By June 30, 2018, all contract, loan, and grant agreements;(ii) By December 31, 2018, all agreements pertaining to funds receivable for work performed by the department, leases, and nonfinancial interagency agreements.(d) Beginning December 1, 2018, the department must annually update the website to include new interagency agreements that the department has entered into and must identify the agreements that have been updated within the past year.(e) For the purposes of this section, the term "interagency agreement" includes but is not limited to memoranda of understanding, grant contracts, and advisory or nonbinding agreements.(f) For purposes of this section, the information posted on the department's website is considered to function as a report to the legislature because the report acts as a mechanism of keeping the legislature apprised of the department's interagency agreements.))Sec. 209. RCW 43.63A.305 and 2009 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The independent youth housing program is created in the department to provide housing stipends to eligible youth to be used for independent housing. In developing a plan for the design, implementation, and operation of the independent youth housing program, the department shall:(a) Adopt policies, requirements, and procedures necessary to administer the program;(b) Contract with one or more eligible organizations described under RCW 43.185A.040 to provide services and conduct administrative activities as described in subsection (3) of this section;(c) Establish eligibility criteria for youth to participate in the independent youth housing program, giving priority to youth who have been dependents of the state for at least one year;(d) Refer interested youth to the designated subcontractor organization administering the program in the area in which the youth intends to reside;(e) Develop a method for determining the amount of the housing stipend, first and last month's rent, and security deposit, where applicable, to be dedicated to participating youth. The method for determining a housing stipend must take into account a youth's age, the youth's total income from all sources, the fair market rent for the area in which the youth lives or intends to live, and a variety of possible living situations for the youth. The amount of housing stipends must be adjusted, by a method and formula established by the department, to promote the successful transition for youth to complete housing self-sufficiency over time;(f) Ensure that the independent youth housing program is integrated and aligned with other state rental assistance and case management programs operated by the department, as well as case management and supportive services programs, including the independent living program, the transitional living program, and other related programs offered by the department of social and health services; and(g) Consult with the department of social and health services and other stakeholders involved with dependent youth, homeless youth, and homeless young adults, as appropriate.(2) The department of social and health services shall collaborate with the department in implementing and operating the independent youth housing program including, but not limited to, the following:(a) Refer potential eligible youth to the department before the youth's eighteenth birthday, if feasible, to include an indication, if known, of where the youth plans to reside after aging out of foster care;(b) Provide information to all youth aged fifteen or older, who are dependents of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW, about the independent youth housing program, encouraging dependents nearing their eighteenth birthday to consider applying for enrollment in the program;(c) Encourage organizations participating in the independent living program and the transitional living program to collaborate with independent youth housing program providers whenever possible to capitalize on resources and provide the greatest amount and variety of services to eligible youth; and(d) Annually provide to the department data reflecting changes in the percentage of youth aging out of the state dependency system each year who are eligible for state assistance, as well as any other data and performance measures that may assist the department to measure program success((; and(e) Annually, beginning by December 31, 2007, provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the interagency council on homelessness as described under RCW 43.185C.170 recommendations of strategies to reach the goals described in RCW 43.63A.311(2)(g))).(3) Under the independent youth housing program, subcontractor organizations shall:(a) Use moneys awarded to the organizations for housing stipends, security deposits, first and last month's rent stipends, case management program costs, and administrative costs. When subcontractor organizations determine that it is necessary to assist participating youth in accessing and maintaining independent housing, subcontractor organizations may also use moneys awarded to pay for professional mental health services and tuition costs for court-ordered classes and programs;(i) Administrative costs for each subcontractor organization may not exceed twelve percent of the estimated total annual grant amount to the subcontractor organization;(ii) All housing stipends, security deposits, and first and last month's rent stipends must be payable only to a landlord or housing manager of any type of independent housing;(b) Enroll eligible youth who are referred by the department and who choose to reside in their assigned service area;(c) Enter eligible youth program participants into the (([Washington]))Washington homeless client management information system as described in RCW 43.185C.180;(d) Monitor participating youth's housing status;(e) Evaluate participating youth's eligibility and compliance with department policies and procedures at least twice a year;(f) Assist participating youth to develop or update an independent living plan focused on obtaining and retaining independent housing or collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already involved to ensure that the youth has an independent living plan;(g) Educate participating youth on tenant rights and responsibilities;(h) Provide support to participating youth in the form of general case management and information and referral services, when necessary, or collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already involved to ensure that the youth is receiving the case management and information and referral services needed;(i) Connect participating youth, when possible, with individual development account programs, other financial literacy programs, and other programs that are designed to help young people acquire economic independence and self-sufficiency, or collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already involved to ensure that the youth is receiving information and referrals to these programs, when appropriate;(j) Submit expenditure and performance reports((, including information related to the performance measures in RCW 43.63A.311,)) to the department on a time schedule determined by the department; and(k) Provide recommendations to the department regarding program improvements and strategies ((that might assist the state to reach its goals as described in RCW 43.63A.311(2)(g))).Sec. 210. RCW 46.92.010 and 2021 c 193 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order to test an autonomous motor vehicle on any public roadway under the department's autonomous vehicle self-certification testing pilot program, the following information must be provided by the self-certifying entity testing the autonomous motor vehicle:(a) Contact information specified by the department;(b) Local jurisdictions where testing is planned;(c) The vehicle identification numbers of the autonomous vehicles being tested, provided that one is required by state or federal law; and(d) Proof of an insurance policy that meets the requirements of RCW 46.30.050.(2) Any autonomous motor vehicle to which subsection (1) of this section is applicable and that does not have a vehicle identification number and is not otherwise required under state or federal law to have a vehicle identification number assigned to it must be assigned a unique identification number that is provided to the department and that is displayed in the vehicle in a manner similar to the display of vehicle identification numbers in motor vehicles.(3)(a) The self-certifying entity testing the autonomous motor vehicle on any public roadway must notify the department of:(i) Any collisions that are required to be reported to law enforcement under RCW 46.52.030, involving an autonomous motor vehicle during testing on any public roadway; and(ii) Any moving violations, as defined in administrative rule as authorized under RCW 46.20.2891, for which a citation or infraction was issued, involving an autonomous motor vehicle during testing on any public roadway.(b) By February 1st of each year, the self-certifying entity must submit a report to the department covering reportable events from the prior calendar year.(c) The self-certifying entity shall provide the information required by the department under (a) of this subsection. The information provided must include whether the autonomous driving system was operating the vehicle at the time of or immediately prior to the collision or moving violation, and in the case of a collision, details regarding the collision, including any loss of life, injury, or property damage that resulted from the collision.(d) The provisions of this section are supplemental to all other rights and duties under law applicable in the event of a motor vehicle collision.(4) The self-certifying entity testing the autonomous motor vehicle on public roadways under the department's autonomous vehicle self-certification testing pilot program must provide written notice in advance of testing to local and state law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over any of the public roadways on which testing will occur that includes the expected period of time during which testing will occur in the applicable jurisdictions, including city police departments within city limits where testing will occur, county sheriff departments outside of city limits in counties where testing will occur, and the Washington state patrol when testing will occur on limited access highways, as defined in RCW 47.52.010. However, for testing primarily on limited access highways that travels through multiple local jurisdictions, which may include the limited incidental use of other roadways, the self-certifying entity must only provide written notice as specified in this subsection to the Washington state patrol. Written notice provided under this subsection must: (a) Be provided not less than fourteen and not more than sixty days in advance of testing; (b) include contact information where the law enforcement agency can communicate with the self-certifying entity testing the autonomous vehicle regarding the testing planned in that jurisdiction; and (c) provide the physical description of the motor vehicle or vehicles being tested, including make, model, color, and license plate number.(5) The department may adopt a fee to be charged by the department for self-certification in an amount sufficient to offset administration by the department of the self-certification testing pilot program.(6) The department shall provide public access to the information self-certifying entities provide to it((, and shall provide an annual report to the house and senate transportation committees of the legislature summarizing the information reported by self-certifying entities under this section)).(7) An autonomous motor vehicle may not be operated on any public roadway for the purposes of testing in Washington state until the department is provided with the information required under subsection (1) of this section.(8) For purposes of this section, "autonomous" means a level four or five driving automation system as provided in the society of automotive engineering international's standard J3016, as it existed on October 1, 2022, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.Sec. 211. RCW 49.04.220 and 2020 c 165 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A significant commercial airplane manufacturer receiving the rate of 0.357 percent under RCW 82.04.260(11)(e) is subject to an aerospace apprenticeship utilization rate of one and five-tenths percent of its qualified apprenticeable workforce in Washington by July 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the 0.357 percent rate authorized under RCW 82.04.260(11)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.(2) The aerospace industry in Washington, excluding a significant commercial airplane manufacturer, is subject to an aerospace apprenticeship utilization rate of one and five-tenths percent of its qualified apprenticeable workforce in Washington by July 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the 0.357 percent rate authorized under RCW 82.04.260(11)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.(3) Aerospace employers must report relevant occupation data related to the qualified apprenticeable workforce to the department of labor and industries.(4) ((The department of labor and industries shall report the aerospace apprenticeship utilization rate to the department [of revenue] and the appropriate committees of the legislature annually beginning October 1, 2024.(5))) The department of labor and industries shall determine aerospace apprenticeship utilization rates under this section based on the framework developed under RCW 49.04.210 and using occupational data reported to the department of labor and industries and/or the employment security department. For data reported to the department of labor and industries, the department of labor and industries shall determine the form and manner in which occupational data is reported, consistent with the framework developed under RCW 49.04.210, and may adopt rules to ensure full participation within the industry necessary to implement the requirements of this section. The department of labor and industries, consulting with the department of revenue, may also require additional information on the annual tax performance report under RCW 82.32.534. The department of labor and industries may adopt rules to ensure full participation within the industry and necessary to implement the requirements of this section.(((6)))(5) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply.(a) "Aerospace employer" means any person that qualifies for the rate under RCW 82.04.260(11)(e) with twenty-five or more employees in positions determined to be qualified occupations by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to this chapter (( 49.04 RCW)) directly applicable to the production of commercial aircraft.(b) "Qualified apprenticeable workforce" means all occupations approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to this chapter (( 49.04 RCW)) directly applicable to the production of commercial aircraft.(c) "Significant commercial airplane manufacturer" means a manufacturer of commercial airplanes with at least fifty thousand full-time employees in Washington as of January 1, 2021.Sec. 212. RCW 71.24.061 and 2024 c 358 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The authority shall provide flexibility to encourage licensed or certified community behavioral health agencies to subcontract with an adequate, culturally competent, and qualified children's mental health provider network.(2) To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose or that nonstate funds are available, a children's mental health evidence-based practice institute shall be established at the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences. The institute shall closely collaborate with entities currently engaged in evaluating and promoting the use of evidence-based, research-based, promising, or consensus-based practices in children's mental health treatment, including but not limited to the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences, Seattle children's hospital, the University of Washington school of nursing, the University of Washington school of social work, and the Washington state institute for public policy. To ensure that funds appropriated are used to the greatest extent possible for their intended purpose, the University of Washington's indirect costs of administration shall not exceed ten percent of appropriated funding. The institute shall:(a) Improve the implementation of evidence-based and research-based practices by providing sustained and effective training and consultation to licensed children's mental health providers and child-serving agencies who are implementing evidence-based or researched-based practices for treatment of children's emotional or behavioral disorders, or who are interested in adapting these practices to better serve ethnically or culturally diverse children. Efforts under this subsection should include a focus on appropriate oversight of implementation of evidence-based practices to ensure fidelity to these practices and thereby achieve positive outcomes;(b) Continue the successful implementation of the "partnerships for success" model by consulting with communities so they may select, implement, and continually evaluate the success of evidence-based practices that are relevant to the needs of children, youth, and families in their community;(c) Partner with youth, family members, family advocacy, and culturally competent provider organizations to develop a series of information sessions, literature, and online resources for families to become informed and engaged in evidence-based and research-based practices;(d) Participate in the identification of outcome-based performance measures under RCW 71.36.025(2) and partner in a statewide effort to implement statewide outcomes monitoring and quality improvement processes; and(e) Serve as a statewide resource to the authority and other entities on child and adolescent evidence-based, research-based, promising, or consensus-based practices for children's mental health treatment, maintaining a working knowledge through ongoing review of academic and professional literature, and knowledge of other evidence-based practice implementation efforts in Washington and other states.(3)(a) To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, the authority in collaboration with the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and Seattle children's hospital shall implement the following access lines:(i) The partnership access line to support primary care providers in the assessment and provision of appropriate diagnosis and treatment of children with mental and behavioral health disorders and track outcomes of this program;(ii) The partnership access line for moms to support obstetricians, pediatricians, primary care providers, mental health professionals, and other health care professionals providing care to pregnant women and new mothers through same-day telephone consultations in the assessment and provision of appropriate diagnosis and treatment of depression in pregnant women and new mothers;(iii) The mental health referral service for children and teens to facilitate referrals to children's mental health services and other resources for parents and guardians with concerns related to the mental health of the parent or guardian's child. Facilitation activities include assessing the level of services needed by the child; within an average of seven days from call intake processing with a parent or guardian, identifying mental health professionals who are in-network with the child's health care coverage who are accepting new patients and taking appointments; coordinating contact between the parent or guardian and the mental health professional; and providing postreferral reviews to determine if the child has outstanding needs. In conducting its referral activities, the program shall collaborate with existing databases and resources to identify in-network mental health professionals; and(iv) The first approach skills training program to provide brief, evidence-based behavioral therapy for youth and families with common mental health concerns.(b) The program activities described in (a) of this subsection shall be designed to promote more accurate diagnoses and treatment through timely case consultation between primary care providers and child psychiatric specialists, and focused educational learning collaboratives with primary care providers.(4) ((The authority, in collaboration with the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and Seattle children's hospital, shall report on the following:(a) The number of individuals who have accessed the resources described in subsection (3) of this section;(b) The number of providers, by type, who have accessed the resources described in subsection (3) of this section;(c) Demographic information, as available, for the individuals described in (a) of this subsection. Demographic information may not include any personally identifiable information and must be limited to the individual's age, gender, and city and county of residence;(d) A description of resources provided;(e) Average time frames from receipt of call to referral for services or resources provided; and(f) Systemic barriers to services, as determined and defined by the health care authority, the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences, and Seattle children's hospital.(5) Beginning December 30, 2019, and annually thereafter, the authority must submit, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature with findings and recommendations for improving services and service delivery from subsection (4) of this section.(6))) The authority shall enforce requirements in managed care contracts to ensure care coordination and network adequacy issues are addressed in order to remove barriers to access to mental health services ((identified in the report described in subsection (4) of this section)).Sec. 213. RCW 71.24.635 and 2024 c 360 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the health care authority must issue a request for proposal and contract with an entity to develop, implement, test, and evaluate guidance and health interventions for health care providers and patients at risk for developing serious complications due to cannabis consumption who are seeking care in emergency departments, primary care settings, behavioral health settings, other health care facilities, and for use by state poison control and recovery hotlines to promote cannabis use reduction and cessation for the following populations:(a) Youth and adults at high risk of adverse mental health impacts from use of high THC cannabis;(b) Youth and adults who have experienced a cannabis-induced first episode psychosis but do not have a diagnosis of a psychotic disorder; and(c) Youth and adults who have a diagnosed psychotic disorder and use cannabis.(2) ((The health care authority must submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the progress toward developing and testing health interventions and recruiting patients and health care facilities to participate by December 1, 2025. The health care authority must provide a progress report on initial outcomes of the health interventions for participating patients and health care facilities by July 1, 2027. The health care authority must submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the results of the interventions and any recommendations for implementation of health interventions by December 1, 2028.(3))) A contract entered under the authorization in this section must include, in the scope of work, data gathering on adverse health impacts occurring in Washington associated with consumption of high THC cannabis((, and data gathered must be included in the reports submitted to the legislature under this section)).(((4)))(3) This section expires December 31, 2028.Sec. 214. RCW 76.09.350 and 2003 c 39 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:The legislature recognizes the importance of providing the greatest diversity of habitats, particularly riparian, wetland, and old growth habitats, and of assuring the greatest diversity of species within those habitats for the survival and reproduction of enough individuals to maintain the native wildlife of Washington forestlands. The legislature also recognizes the importance of long-term habitat productivity for natural and wild fish, for the protection of hatchery water supplies, and for the protection of water quality and quantity to meet the needs of people, fish, and wildlife. The legislature recognizes the importance of maintaining and enhancing fish and wildlife habitats capable of sustaining the commercial and noncommercial uses of fish and wildlife. The legislature further recognizes the importance of the continued growth and development of the state's forest products industry which has a vital stake in the long-term productivity of both the public and private forestland base.The development of a landscape planning system would help achieve these goals. Landowners and resource managers should be provided incentives to voluntarily develop long-term multispecies landscape management plans that will provide protection to public resources. Because landscape planning represents a departure from the use of standard baseline rules and may result in unintended consequences to both the affected habitats and to a landowner's economic interests, the legislature desires to establish up to seven experimental pilot programs to gain experience with landscape planning that may prove useful in fashioning legislation of a more general application.(1) Until December 31, 2000, the department in cooperation with the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when relating to water quality protection, is granted authority to select not more than seven pilot projects for the purpose of developing individual landowner multispecies landscape management plans.(a) Pilot project participants must be selected by the department in cooperation with the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when relating to water quality protection, no later than October 1, 1997.(b) The number and the location of the pilot projects are to be determined by the department in cooperation with the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when relating to water quality protection, and should be selected on the basis of risk to the habitat and species, variety and importance of species and habitats in the planning area, geographic distribution, surrounding ownership, other ongoing landscape and watershed planning activities in the area, potential benefits to water quantity and quality, financial and staffing capabilities of participants, and other factors that will contribute to the creation of landowner multispecies landscape planning efforts.(c) Each pilot project shall have a landscape management plan with the following elements:(i) An identification of public resources selected for coverage under the plan and measurable objectives for the protection of the selected public resources;(ii) A termination date of not later than 2050;(iii) A general description of the planning area including its geographic location, physical and biological features, habitats, and species known to be present;(iv) An identification of the existing forest practices rules that will not apply during the term of the plan;(v) Proposed habitat management strategies or prescriptions;(vi) A projection of the habitat conditions likely to result from the implementation of the specified management strategies or prescriptions;(vii) An assessment of habitat requirements and the current habitat conditions of representative species included in the plan;(viii) An assessment of potential or likely impacts to representative species resulting from the prescribed forest practices;(ix) A description of the anticipated benefits to those species or other species as a result of plan implementation;(x) A monitoring plan;(xi) Reporting requirements including a schedule for review of the plan's performance in meeting its objectives;(xii) Conditions under which a plan may be modified, including a procedure for adaptive management;(xiii) Conditions under which a plan may be terminated;(xiv) A procedure for adaptive management that evaluates the effectiveness of the plan to meet its measurable public resources objectives, reflects changes in the best available science, and provides changes to its habitat management strategies, prescriptions, and hydraulic project standards to the extent agreed to in the plan and in a timely manner and schedule;(xv) A description of how the plan relates to publicly available plans of adjacent federal, state, tribal, and private timberland owners; and(xvi) A statement of whether the landowner intends to apply for approval of the plan under applicable federal law.(2) Until December 31, 2000, the department, in agreement with the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when the landowner elects to cover water quality in the plan, shall approve a landscape management plan and enter into a binding implementation agreement with the landowner when such departments find, based upon the best scientific data available, that:(a) The plan contains all of the elements required under this section including measurable public resource objectives;(b) The plan is expected to be effective in meeting those objectives;(c) The landowner has sufficient financial resources to implement the management strategies or prescriptions to be implemented by the landowner under the plan;(d) The plan will:(i) Provide better protection than current state law for the public resources selected for coverage under the plan considered in the aggregate; and(ii) Compared to conditions that could result from compliance with current state law:(A) Not result in poorer habitat conditions over the life of the plan for any species selected for coverage that is listed as threatened or endangered under federal or state law, or that has been identified as a candidate for such listing, at the time the plan is approved; and(B) Measurably improve habitat conditions for species selected for special consideration under the plan;(e) The plan shall include watershed analysis or provide for a level of protection that meets or exceeds the protection that would be provided by watershed analysis, if the landowner selects fish or water quality as a public resource to be covered under the plan. Any alternative process to watershed analysis would be subject to timely peer review;(f) The planning process provides for a public participation process during the development of the plan, which shall be developed by the department in cooperation with the landowner.The management plans must be submitted to the department and the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when the landowner elects to cover water quality in the plan, no later than March 1, 2000. The department shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the proposed plan. The comment period shall not be less than forty-five days. The department shall approve or reject plans within one hundred twenty days of submittal by the landowner of a final plan. The decision by the department, in agreement with the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when the landowner has elected to cover water quality in the plan, to approve or disapprove the management plan is subject to the environmental review process of chapter 43.21C RCW, provided that any public comment period provided for under chapter 43.21C RCW shall run concurrently with the public comment period provided in this subsection (2).(3) After a landscape management plan is adopted:(a) Forest practices consistent with the plan need not comply with:(i) The specific forest practices rules identified in the plan; and(ii) Any forest practice rules and policies adopted after the approval of the plan to the extent that the rules:(A) Have been adopted primarily for the protection of a public resource selected for coverage under the plan; or(B) Provide for procedural or administrative obligations inconsistent with or in addition to those provided for in the plan with respect to those public resources; and(b) If the landowner has selected fish as one of the public resources to be covered under the plan, the plan shall serve as the hydraulic project approval for the life of the plan, in compliance with RCW ((77.55.100))77.55.021.(4) The department is authorized to issue a single landscape level permit valid for the life of the plan to a landowner who has an approved landscape management plan and who has requested a landscape permit from the department. Landowners receiving a landscape level permit shall meet annually with the department and the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology where water quality has been selected as a public resource to be covered under the plan, to review the specific forest practices activities planned for the next twelve months and to determine whether such activities are in compliance with the plan. The departments will consult with the affected Indian tribes and other interested parties who have expressed an interest in connection with the review. The landowner is to provide ten calendar days' notice to the department prior to the commencement of any forest practices authorized under a landscape level permit. The landscape level permit will not impose additional conditions relating to the public resources selected for coverage under the plan beyond those agreed to in the plan. For the purposes of chapter 43.21C RCW, forest practices conducted in compliance with an approved plan are deemed not to have the potential for a substantial impact on the environment as to any public resource selected for coverage under the plan.(5) Except as otherwise provided in a plan, the agreement implementing the landscape management plan is an agreement that runs with the property covered by the approved landscape management plan and the department shall record notice of the plan in the real property records of the counties in which the affected properties are located. Prior to its termination, no plan shall permit forestland covered by its terms to be withdrawn from such coverage, whether by sale, exchange, or other means, nor to be converted to nonforestry uses except to the extent that such withdrawal or conversion would not measurably impair the achievement of the plan's stated public resource objectives. If a participant transfers all or part of its interest in the property, the terms of the plan still apply to the new landowner for the plan's stated duration unless the plan is terminated under its terms or unless the plan specifies the conditions under which the terms of the plan do not apply to the new landowner.(6) The departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and ecology shall seek to develop memorandums of agreements with federal agencies and affected Indian tribes relating to tribal issues in the landscape management plans. The departments shall solicit input from affected Indian tribes in connection with the selection, review, and approval of any landscape management plan. If any recommendation is received from an affected Indian tribe and is not adopted by the departments, the departments shall provide a written explanation of their reasons for not adopting the recommendation.(((7) The department is directed to report to the forest practices board annually through the year 2000, but no later than December 31st of each year, on the status of each pilot project. The department is directed to provide to the forest practices board, no later than December 31, 2000, an evaluation of the pilot projects including a determination if a permanent landscape planning process should be established along with a discussion of what legislative and rule modifications are necessary.))Sec. 215. RCW 76.09.360 and 1997 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The department together with the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology relating to water quality protection, shall develop a suitable process to permit landowners to secure all permits required for the conduct of forest practices in a single multiyear permit to be jointly issued by the departments ((and the departments shall report their findings to the legislature not later than December 31, 2000)).Sec. 216. RCW 76.09.368 and 2002 c 120 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislature intends that small forestland owners have access to alternate plan processes or alternate harvest restrictions, or both if necessary, that meet the public resource protection standard set forth in RCW 76.09.370(3), but which also lowers the overall cost of regulation to small forestland owners including, but not limited to, timber value forgone, layout costs, and operating costs. The forest practices board shall consult with the small forestland owner office advisory committee in developing these alternate approaches. ((By July 1, 2003, the forest practices board shall provide the legislature with a written report that describes the board's progress in developing alternate plan processes or alternate harvest restrictions, or both if necessary, that meet legislative intent.))(2) As used in this section, "small forestland owner" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 76.13.120(2).Sec. 217. RCW 76.09.420 and 2003 c 311 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board must amend the forest practices rules relating to road maintenance and abandonment plans that exist on May 14, 2003, to reflect the following:(a) A forestland owner who owns a total of eighty acres or less of forestland in Washington is not required to submit a road maintenance and abandonment plan for any block of forestland that is twenty contiguous acres or less in area;(b) A landowner who satisfies the definition of a small forestland owner, but who does not qualify under (a) of this subsection, is only required to submit a checklist road maintenance and abandonment plan with the abbreviated content requirements provided for in subsection (3) of this section, and is not required to comply with annual reporting and review requirements; and(c) Existing forest roads must be maintained only to the extent necessary to prevent damage to public resources.(2) The department must provide a landowner who is either exempted from submitting a road maintenance and abandonment plan under subsection (1)(a) of this section, or who qualifies for a checklist road maintenance and abandonment plan under subsection (1)(b) of this section, with an educational brochure outlining road maintenance standards and requirements. In addition, the department must develop a series of nonmandatory educational workshops on the rules associated with road construction and maintenance.(3)(a) A landowner who qualifies for a checklist road maintenance and abandonment plan under subsection (1)(b) of this section is only required to submit a checklist, designed by the department in consultation with the small forestland owner office advisory committee created in RCW 76.13.110, that confirms that the landowner is applying the checklist criteria to forest roads covered or affected by a forest practices application or notification. When developing the checklist road maintenance and abandonment plan, the department shall ensure that the checklist does not exceed current state law. Nothing in this subsection increases or adds to small forestland owners' duties or responsibilities under any other section of the forest practices rules or any other state law or rule.(b) A landowner who qualifies for the checklist road maintenance and abandonment plan is not required to submit the checklist before the time that he or she submits a forest practices application or notification for final or intermediate harvesting, or for salvage of trees. The department may encourage and accept checklists prior to the time that they are due.(4) ((The department must monitor the extent of the checklist road maintenance and abandonment plan approach and report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2008, and December 31, 2013.(5))) The board shall adopt emergency rules under RCW 34.05.090 by October 31, 2003, to implement this section. The emergency rules shall remain in effect until permanent rules can be adopted. The forest practices rules that relate to road maintenance and abandonment plans shall remain in effect as they existed on May 14, 2003, until emergency rules have been adopted under this section.(((6)))(5) This section is only intended to relate to the board's duties as they relate to the road maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forests and fish report. Nothing in this section alters any forestland owner's duties and responsibilities under any other section of the forest practices rules, or any other state law or rule.Sec. 218. RCW 79.110.240 and 2017 c 19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Until July 1, 2030, the charge for the term of an easement granted under RCW 79.110.230(2) will be determined as follows and will be paid in advance upon grant of the easement:(a) Five thousand dollars for individual easement crossings that are no longer than one mile in length;(b) Twelve thousand five hundred dollars for individual easement crossings that are more than one mile but less than five miles in length; or(c) Twenty thousand dollars for individual easement crossings that are five miles or more in length.(2) The charge for easements under subsection (1) of this section must be adjusted annually by the rate of yearly change in the most recently published Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton consumer price index, all urban consumers (CPI-U), over the consumer price index for the same period of the preceding year, as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington rounded up to the nearest fifty dollars.(3) The term of the easement is thirty years or a period of less than thirty years if requested by the person or entity seeking the easement.(4) In addition to the charge for the easement under subsection (1) of this section, the department may recover its administrative costs incurred in receiving an application for the easement, approving the easement, and reviewing plans for and construction of the public utility lines. For the purposes of this subsection, "administrative costs" is equivalent to twenty percent of the fee for the easement as determined under subsection (1) of this section and adjusted under subsection (2) of this section. For public utility lines owned by a governmental entity, the administrative costs will be calculated based on the length of the easement and the fee that it would be charged if it were subject to the easement charges in this section. When multiple public utility lines are owned by the same entity and are authorized under the same easement, the administrative fee for the easement shall be equal to twenty percent of the easement fee for the single longest public utility line. Administrative costs recovered by the department must be deposited into the resource management cost account.(5) Applicants under RCW 79.110.230(2) providing a residence with an individual service connection for electrical, natural gas, cable television, or telecommunications service are not required to pay the charge for the easement under subsection (1) of this section but shall pay administrative costs under subsection (4) of this section.(6) A final decision on applications for an easement must be made within one hundred twenty days after the department receives the completed application and after all applicable regulatory permits for the aquatic easement have been acquired. This subsection applies to applications submitted before June 13, 2002, as well as to applications submitted on or after June 13, 2002. Upon request of the applicant, the department may reach a decision on an application within sixty days and charge an additional fee for an expedited processing. The fee for an expedited processing is ten percent of the combined total of the easement charge and administrative costs.(((7) Beginning December 31, 2021, every four years the legislature shall review the granting of easements on state-owned aquatic lands under this chapter and determine whether all applications for easements are processed within one hundred twenty days for normal processing of applications and sixty days for expedited processing of applications, and whether the granting of easements on state-owned aquatic lands generates reasonable income for the aquatic lands enhancement account.))Sec. 219. RCW 82.08.9999 and 2022 c 182 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning August 1, 2019, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after the qualification period start date:(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply as provided in (b) of this subsection to sales or leases of new or used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles that:(i) Are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel; or(ii) Use at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and are capable of traveling at least 30 miles using only battery power; and(iii)(A) Have a vehicle selling price plus trade-in property of like kind for purchased vehicles that:(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $45,000; or(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $30,000; or(B) Have a fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles that:(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $45,000; or(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $30,000;(b)(i) The exemption in this section is applicable for up to the amounts specified in (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection of:(A) The total amount of the vehicle's selling price, for sales made; or(B) The total lease payments made plus any additional selling price of the leased vehicle if the original lessee purchases the leased vehicle before the qualification period end date, for lease agreements signed.(ii) Based on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed of the vehicle if the vehicle is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed:(A) From the qualification period start date until July 31, 2021, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $25,000;(B) From August 1, 2021, until July 31, 2023, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $20,000;(C) From August 1, 2023, until July 31, 2025, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $15,000.(iii) If the vehicle is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $16,000.(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. A person claiming the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; whether the vehicle has been sold or leased; date of sale or start date of lease; length of lease; sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle, in addition to the future monthly amount to be claimed for each leased vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(3)(a) The department of licensing must maintain and publish a list of all vehicle models qualifying for the tax exemptions under this section or RCW 82.12.9999 until the expiration date of this section, and is authorized to issue final rulings on vehicle model qualification for these criteria. A seller is not responsible for repayment of the tax exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 for a vehicle if the department of licensing's published list of qualifying vehicle models on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed includes the vehicle model and the department of licensing subsequently removes the vehicle model from the published list, and, if applicable, the vehicle meets the qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).(b) The department of revenue retains responsibility for determining whether a vehicle meets the applicable qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).(4) ((By the last day of October 2019, and every six months thereafter until this section expires, based on the best available data, the department must report the following information to the transportation committees of the legislature: The cumulative number of vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 by month of purchase or lease start and vehicle make and model; the dollar amount of all state retail sales and use taxes exempted on or after the qualification period start date, under this section and RCW 82.12.9999; and estimates of the future costs of leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999.(5))) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Clean alternative fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, effective January 1, 2019, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.(b) "Fair market value" has the same meaning as "value of the article used" in RCW 82.12.010.(c) "New vehicle" has the same meaning as "new motor vehicle" in RCW 46.04.358.(d) "Qualification period end date" means August 1, 2025.(e) "Qualification period start date" means August 1, 2019.(f) "Used vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.660.(((6)))(5)(a) Sales of vehicles delivered to the buyer or leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed after the qualification period end date do not qualify for the exemption under this section.(b) All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section before the qualification period end date must continue to receive the exemption as described under subsection (1)(b) of this section on any lease payments due through the remainder of the lease before August 1, 2028.(((7)))(6) This section expires August 1, 2028.(((8)))(7) This section is supported by the revenues generated in RCW 46.17.324, and therefore takes effect only if RCW 46.17.324 is enacted by June 30, 2019.Sec. 220. RCW 82.14.470 and 2011 c 363 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a)(i) Moneys collected from the taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.465 may be used only for the following purposes:(A) Principal and interest payments on bonds issued to finance or refinance public improvements in a benefit zone under the authority of RCW 39.100.060;(B) Principal and interest payments on other bonds issued by the local government to finance public improvements; or(C) Payments for public improvement costs.(ii) Moneys collected and used as provided in (a)(i) of this subsection must be matched with an amount from local public sources dedicated, as further provided in RCW 82.14.465 (4)(c)(ii) and (7)(k), through December 31st of the previous calendar year to finance public improvements authorized under chapter 39.100 RCW.(b) Local public sources are dedicated to finance public improvements if they: (i) Are actually expended to pay public improvement costs or debt service on bonds issued for public improvements; or (ii) are required by law or an agreement to be used exclusively to pay public improvement costs or debt service on bonds issued for public improvements.(c) A city, town, or county is not required to expend taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.465 in the fiscal year in which the taxes are received.(2) A local government must inform the department by the first day of March of the amount of local public sources allocated to the preceding calendar year to finance public improvements authorized under chapter 39.100 RCW.(3) If a local government fails to comply with subsection (2) of this section, no tax may be imposed under RCW 82.14.465 in the subsequent fiscal year.(4)(a) A local government must provide a report to the department and the state auditor by March 1st of each year. A local government must make a good faith effort to provide information required for the report.(b) The report must contain the following information:(i) The amount of tax allocation revenues, taxes under RCW 82.14.465, and local public sources received by the local government during the preceding calendar year, and a summary of how these revenues were expended; and(ii) The names of any businesses known to the local government that have located within the benefit zone as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing.(((5) The department must make a report available to the public and the legislature by June 1st of each year. The report must include a list of public improvements undertaken by local governments and financed in whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing, and it must also include a summary of the information provided to the department by local governments under subsection (4) of this section.))Sec. 221. RCW 90.82.080 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 4 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If the initiating governments choose, by majority vote, to include an instream flow component, it shall be accomplished in the following manner:(i) If minimum instream flows have already been adopted by rule for a stream within the management area, unless the members of the local governments and tribes on the planning unit by a recorded unanimous vote request the department to modify those flows, the minimum instream flows shall not be modified under this chapter. If the members of local governments and tribes request the planning unit to modify instream flows and unanimous approval of the decision to modify such flow is not achieved, then the instream flows shall not be modified under this section;(ii) If minimum streamflows have not been adopted by rule for a stream within the management area, setting the minimum instream flows shall be a collaborative effort between the department and members of the planning unit. The department must attempt to achieve consensus and approval among the members of the planning unit regarding the minimum flows to be adopted by the department. Approval is achieved if all government members and tribes that have been invited and accepted on the planning unit present for a recorded vote unanimously vote to support the proposed minimum instream flows, and all nongovernmental members of the planning unit present for the recorded vote, by a majority, vote to support the proposed minimum instream flows.(b) The department shall undertake rule making to adopt flows under (a) of this subsection. The department may adopt the rules either by the regular rules adoption process provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the expedited rules adoption process as set forth in RCW 34.05.353, or through a rules adoption process that uses public hearings and notice provided by the county legislative authority to the greatest extent possible. Such rules do not constitute significant legislative rules as defined in RCW 34.05.328, and do not require the preparation of small business economic impact statements.(c) If approval is not achieved within four years of the date the planning unit first receives funds from the department for conducting watershed assessments under RCW 90.82.040, the department may promptly initiate rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW to establish flows for those streams and shall have two additional years to establish the instream flows for those streams for which approval is not achieved.(2)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 90.03.345, minimum instream flows set under this section for rivers or streams that do not have existing minimum instream flow levels set by rule of the department shall have a priority date of two years after funding is first received from the department under RCW 90.82.040, unless determined otherwise by a unanimous vote of the members of the planning unit but in no instance may it be later than the effective date of the rule adopting such flow.(b) Any increase to an existing minimum instream flow set by rule of the department shall have a priority date of two years after funding is first received for planning in the WRIA or multi-WRIA area from the department under RCW 90.82.040 and the priority date of the portion of the minimum instream flow previously established by rule shall retain its priority date as established under RCW 90.03.345.(c) Any existing minimum instream flow set by rule of the department that is reduced shall retain its original date of priority as established by RCW 90.03.345 for the revised amount of the minimum instream flow level.(3) Before setting minimum instream flows under this section, the department shall engage in government-to-government consultation with affected tribes in the management area regarding the setting of such flows.(4) Nothing in this chapter either: (a) Affects the department's authority to establish flow requirements or other conditions under RCW 90.48.260 or the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) for the licensing or relicensing of a hydroelectric power project under the federal power act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 791 et seq.); or (b) affects or impairs existing instream flow requirements and other conditions in a current license for a hydroelectric power project licensed under the federal power act.(5) If the planning unit is unable to obtain unanimity under subsection (1) of this section, the department may adopt rules setting such flows.(((6) The department shall report annually to the appropriate legislative standing committees on the progress of instream flows being set under this chapter, as well as progress toward setting instream flows in those watersheds not being planned under this chapter. The report shall be made by December 1, 2003, and by December 1st of each subsequent year.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 222. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 18.28.800 (Nonprofit or exempt organizationsâReport) and 2015 c 167 s 4;(2) RCW 28A.305.035 (Joint report to the legislature) and 2006 c 263 s 103 & 2005 c 497 s 103;(3) RCW 28A.657.110 (Accountability framework for system of support for challenged schoolsâWashington achievement indexâRecognition of schools for exemplary performanceâUse of state system to replace federal accountability system) and 2013 c 159 s 12, 2010 c 235 s 111, & 2009 c 548 s 503;(4) RCW 28B.122.060 (Annual report) and 2012 c 50 s 8 & 2011 c 8 s 6;(5) RCW 43.31.980 (Impact fee annual report) and 2015 c 241 s 4;(6) RCW 43.41.423 (Extended student financial aidâReports on impact) and 2024 c 323 s 6;(7) RCW 43.62.050 (Student enrollment forecastsâReport) and 1979 c 151 s 131, 1977 c 75 s 62, 1975 1st ex.s. c 293 s 2, & 1965 c 8 s 43.62.050;(8) RCW 43.63A.311 (Independent youth housing programâSubcontractor organization performance review and report) and 2007 c 316 s 5;(9) RCW 70.330.020 (Reports to governor and legislature) and 2016 c 56 s 2; and(10) RCW 74.08A.411 (Outcome measuresâDataâReport to the legislature and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force) and 2019 c 343 s 4 & 2009 c 85 s 3.--- END ---